src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/adj-lla_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that belong to LEXICON ÁLLA, ÆLLA and SJONÁLLA. All the adjectives are loan words that have been adapted to lulesami.

Tests:

  Adjective - antisosiálla: #  ÁLLA
    antisosiálla+A+Attr: antisosiála
    antisosiálla+A+Sg+Nom: antisosiálla
    antisosiálla+A+Sg+Gen: antisosiála
    antisosiálla+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: antisosiálap
    antisosiálla+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: antisosiálamus
    antisosiálla+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - aspektuálla: # ÁLLA
    aspektuælla+A+Attr: aspektuella
    aspektuælla+A+Sg+Nom: [aspektuælla, aspektuälla]
    aspektuælla+A+Sg+Acc: aspektuellav
    aspektuælla+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: aspektuellap
    aspektuælla+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: aspektuellamus
    aspektuælla+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - paralælla: # ÆLLA
    paralælla+A+Attr: [paralella]
    paralælla+A+Sg+Nom: [paralælla, paralälla]
    paralælla+A+Sg+Gen: [paralella]
    paralælla+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: paralellap
    paralælla+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: paralellamus
